test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kv25_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # kv_
    gás+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: gás
    gás+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: gás
    gás+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: gás
    gás+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: gásar
    gás+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: gæs
    gás+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: gásum
    gás+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: gása
    gás+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: gásin
    gás+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: gásina
    gás+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: gásini
    gás+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: gásarinnar
    gás+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: gæsnar
    gás+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: [gásunum, gæsnum]
    gás+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: gásanna
